Illinois, session 104th, HB1701.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Property Tax Code is amended by changing 5Section 15-172 as follows: 6    (35 ILCS 200/15-172)7    Sec. 15-172. Low-Income Senior Citizens Assessment Freeze 8Homestead Exemption. 9    (a) This Section may be cited as the Low-Income Senior 10Citizens Assessment Freeze Homestead Exemption.11    (b) As used in this Section:12    "Applicant" means an individual who has filed an 13application under this Section.14    "Base amount" means the base year equalized assessed value 15of the residence plus the first year's equalized assessed 16value of any added improvements which increased the assessed 17value of the residence after the base year.18    "Base year" means the taxable year prior to the taxable 19year for which the applicant first qualifies and applies for 20the exemption provided that in the prior taxable year the 21property was improved with a permanent structure that was 22occupied as a residence by the applicant who was liable for 23paying real property taxes on the property and who was either   HB1701- 2 -LRB104 05876 HLH 15907 b1(i) an owner of record of the property or had legal or 2equitable interest in the property as evidenced by a written 3instrument or (ii) had a legal or equitable interest as a 4lessee in the parcel of property that was single family 5residence. If in any subsequent taxable year for which the 6applicant applies and qualifies for the exemption the 7equalized assessed value of the residence is less than the 8equalized assessed value in the existing base year (provided 9that such equalized assessed value is not based on an assessed 10value that results from a temporary irregularity in the 11property that reduces the assessed value for one or more 12taxable years), then that subsequent taxable year shall become 13the base year until a new base year is established under the 14terms of this paragraph. For taxable year 1999 only, the Chief 15County Assessment Officer shall review (i) all taxable years 16for which the applicant applied and qualified for the 17exemption and (ii) the existing base year. The assessment 18officer shall select as the new base year the year with the 19lowest equalized assessed value. An equalized assessed value 20that is based on an assessed value that results from a 21temporary irregularity in the property that reduces the 22assessed value for one or more taxable years shall not be 23considered the lowest equalized assessed value. The selected 24year shall be the base year for taxable year 1999 and 25thereafter until a new base year is established under the 26terms of this paragraph.  HB1701- 3 -LRB104 05876 HLH 15907 b1    "Chief County Assessment Officer" means the County 2Assessor or Supervisor of Assessments of the county in which 3the property is located.4    "Equalized assessed value" means the assessed value as 5equalized by the Illinois Department of Revenue.6    "Household" means the applicant, the spouse of the 7applicant, and all persons using the residence of the 8applicant as their principal place of residence.9    "Household income" means the combined income of the 10members of a household for the calendar year preceding the 11taxable year.12    "Income" has the same meaning as provided in Section 3.07 13of the Senior Citizens and Persons with Disabilities Property 14Tax Relief Act, except that, beginning in assessment year 152001, "income" does not include veteran's benefits.16    "Internal Revenue Code of 1986" means the United States 17Internal Revenue Code of 1986 or any successor law or laws 18relating to federal income taxes in effect for the year 19preceding the taxable year.20    "Life care facility that qualifies as a cooperative" means 21a facility as defined in Section 2 of the Life Care Facilities 22Act.23    "Maximum income limitation" means:24        (1) $35,000 prior to taxable year 1999;25        (2) $40,000 in taxable years 1999 through 2003;26        (3) $45,000 in taxable years 2004 through 2005;  HB1701- 4 -LRB104 05876 HLH 15907 b1        (4) $50,000 in taxable years 2006 and 2007;2        (5) $55,000 in taxable years 2008 through 2016; 3        (6) for taxable year 2017, (i) $65,000 for qualified 4    property located in a county with 3,000,000 or more 5    inhabitants and (ii) $55,000 for qualified property 6    located in a county with fewer than 3,000,000 inhabitants; 7    and 8        (7) for taxable years 2018 through 2025 and 9    thereafter, $65,000 for all qualified property; and . 10        (8) for taxable years 2026 and thereafter, the maximum 11    income limitation for the immediately preceding taxable 12    year, increased by the annual cost of living adjustment, 13    if any, in Social Security and Supplemental Security 14    Income benefits that takes effect in that taxable year. 15    As an alternative income valuation, a homeowner who is 16enrolled in any of the following programs may be presumed to 17have household income that does not exceed the maximum income 18limitation for that tax year as required by this Section: Aid 19to the Aged, Blind or Disabled (AABD) Program or the 20Supplemental Nutrition Assistance Program (SNAP), both of 21which are administered by the Department of Human Services; 22the Low Income Home Energy Assistance Program (LIHEAP), which 23is administered by the Department of Commerce and Economic 24Opportunity; The Benefit Access program, which is administered 25by the Department on Aging; and the Senior Citizens Real 26Estate Tax Deferral Program.   HB1701- 5 -LRB104 05876 HLH 15907 b1    A chief county assessment officer may indicate that he or 2she has verified an applicant's income eligibility for this 3exemption but may not report which program or programs, if 4any, enroll the applicant. Release of personal information 5submitted pursuant to this Section shall be deemed an 6unwarranted invasion of personal privacy under the Freedom of 7Information Act. 8    "Residence" means the principal dwelling place and 9appurtenant structures used for residential purposes in this 10State occupied on January 1 of the taxable year by a household 11and so much of the surrounding land, constituting the parcel 12upon which the dwelling place is situated, as is used for 13residential purposes. If the Chief County Assessment Officer 14has established a specific legal description for a portion of 15property constituting the residence, then that portion of 16property shall be deemed the residence for the purposes of 17this Section.18    "Taxable year" means the calendar year during which ad 19valorem property taxes payable in the next succeeding year are 20levied.21    (c) Beginning in taxable year 1994, a low-income senior 22citizens assessment freeze homestead exemption is granted for 23real property that is improved with a permanent structure that 24is occupied as a residence by an applicant who (i) is 65 years 25of age or older during the taxable year, (ii) has a household 26income that does not exceed the maximum income limitation,   HB1701- 6 -LRB104 05876 HLH 15907 b1(iii) is liable for paying real property taxes on the 2property, and (iv) is an owner of record of the property or has 3a legal or equitable interest in the property as evidenced by a 4written instrument. This homestead exemption shall also apply 5to a leasehold interest in a parcel of property improved with a 6permanent structure that is a single family residence that is 7occupied as a residence by a person who (i) is 65 years of age 8or older during the taxable year, (ii) has a household income 9that does not exceed the maximum income limitation, (iii) has 10a legal or equitable ownership interest in the property as 11lessee, and (iv) is liable for the payment of real property 12taxes on that property. 13    In counties of 3,000,000 or more inhabitants, the amount 14of the exemption for all taxable years is the equalized 15assessed value of the residence in the taxable year for which 16application is made minus the base amount. In all other 17counties, the amount of the exemption is as follows: (i) 18through taxable year 2005 and for taxable year 2007 and 19thereafter, the amount of this exemption shall be the 20equalized assessed value of the residence in the taxable year 21for which application is made minus the base amount; and (ii) 22for taxable year 2006, the amount of the exemption is as 23follows:24        (1) For an applicant who has a household income of 25    $45,000 or less, the amount of the exemption is the 26    equalized assessed value of the residence in the taxable   HB1701- 7 -LRB104 05876 HLH 15907 b1    year for which application is made minus the base amount.2        (2) For an applicant who has a household income 3    exceeding $45,000 but not exceeding $46,250, the amount of 4    the exemption is (i) the equalized assessed value of the 5    residence in the taxable year for which application is 6    made minus the base amount (ii) multiplied by 0.8.7        (3) For an applicant who has a household income 8    exceeding $46,250 but not exceeding $47,500, the amount of 9    the exemption is (i) the equalized assessed value of the 10    residence in the taxable year for which application is 11    made minus the base amount (ii) multiplied by 0.6.12        (4) For an applicant who has a household income 13    exceeding $47,500 but not exceeding $48,750, the amount of 14    the exemption is (i) the equalized assessed value of the 15    residence in the taxable year for which application is 16    made minus the base amount (ii) multiplied by 0.4.17        (5) For an applicant who has a household income 18    exceeding $48,750 but not exceeding $50,000, the amount of 19    the exemption is (i) the equalized assessed value of the 20    residence in the taxable year for which application is 21    made minus the base amount (ii) multiplied by 0.2. 22    When the applicant is a surviving spouse of an applicant 23for a prior year for the same residence for which an exemption 24under this Section has been granted, the base year and base 25amount for that residence are the same as for the applicant for 26the prior year.  HB1701- 8 -LRB104 05876 HLH 15907 b1    Each year at the time the assessment books are certified 2to the County Clerk, the Board of Review or Board of Appeals 3shall give to the County Clerk a list of the assessed values of 4improvements on each parcel qualifying for this exemption that 5were added after the base year for this parcel and that 6increased the assessed value of the property.7    In the case of land improved with an apartment building 8owned and operated as a cooperative or a building that is a 9life care facility that qualifies as a cooperative, the 10maximum reduction from the equalized assessed value of the 11property is limited to the sum of the reductions calculated 12for each unit occupied as a residence by a person or persons 13(i) 65 years of age or older, (ii) with a household income that 14does not exceed the maximum income limitation, (iii) who is 15liable, by contract with the owner or owners of record, for 16paying real property taxes on the property, and (iv) who is an 17owner of record of a legal or equitable interest in the 18cooperative apartment building, other than a leasehold 19interest. In the instance of a cooperative where a homestead 20exemption has been granted under this Section, the cooperative 21association or its management firm shall credit the savings 22resulting from that exemption only to the apportioned tax 23liability of the owner who qualified for the exemption. Any 24person who willfully refuses to credit that savings to an 25owner who qualifies for the exemption is guilty of a Class B 26misdemeanor.  HB1701- 9 -LRB104 05876 HLH 15907 b1    When a homestead exemption has been granted under this 2Section and an applicant then becomes a resident of a facility 3licensed under the Assisted Living and Shared Housing Act, the 4Nursing Home Care Act, the Specialized Mental Health 5Rehabilitation Act of 2013, the ID/DD Community Care Act, or 6the MC/DD Act, the exemption shall be granted in subsequent 7years so long as the residence (i) continues to be occupied by 8the qualified applicant's spouse or (ii) if remaining 9unoccupied, is still owned by the qualified applicant for the 10homestead exemption.11    Beginning January 1, 1997, when an individual dies who 12would have qualified for an exemption under this Section, and 13the surviving spouse does not independently qualify for this 14exemption because of age, the exemption under this Section 15shall be granted to the surviving spouse for the taxable year 16preceding and the taxable year of the death, provided that, 17except for age, the surviving spouse meets all other 18qualifications for the granting of this exemption for those 19years.20    When married persons maintain separate residences, the 21exemption provided for in this Section may be claimed by only 22one of such persons and for only one residence.23    For taxable year 1994 only, in counties having less than 243,000,000 inhabitants, to receive the exemption, a person 25shall submit an application by February 15, 1995 to the Chief 26County Assessment Officer of the county in which the property   HB1701- 10 -LRB104 05876 HLH 15907 b1is located. In counties having 3,000,000 or more inhabitants, 2for taxable year 1994 and all subsequent taxable years, to 3receive the exemption, a person may submit an application to 4the Chief County Assessment Officer of the county in which the 5property is located during such period as may be specified by 6the Chief County Assessment Officer. The Chief County 7Assessment Officer in counties of 3,000,000 or more 8inhabitants shall annually give notice of the application 9period by mail or by publication. In counties having less than 103,000,000 inhabitants, beginning with taxable year 1995 and 11thereafter, to receive the exemption, a person shall submit an 12application by July 1 of each taxable year to the Chief County 13Assessment Officer of the county in which the property is 14located. A county may, by ordinance, establish a date for 15submission of applications that is different than July 1. The 16applicant shall submit with the application an affidavit of 17the applicant's total household income, age, marital status 18(and if married the name and address of the applicant's 19spouse, if known), and principal dwelling place of members of 20the household on January 1 of the taxable year. The Department 21shall establish, by rule, a method for verifying the accuracy 22of affidavits filed by applicants under this Section, and the 23Chief County Assessment Officer may conduct audits of any 24taxpayer claiming an exemption under this Section to verify 25that the taxpayer is eligible to receive the exemption. Each 26application shall contain or be verified by a written   HB1701- 11 -LRB104 05876 HLH 15907 b1declaration that it is made under the penalties of perjury. A 2taxpayer's signing a fraudulent application under this Act is 3perjury, as defined in Section 32-2 of the Criminal Code of 42012. The applications shall be clearly marked as applications 5for the Low-Income Senior Citizens Assessment Freeze Homestead 6Exemption and must contain a notice that any taxpayer who 7receives the exemption is subject to an audit by the Chief 8County Assessment Officer.9    Notwithstanding any other provision to the contrary, in 10counties having fewer than 3,000,000 inhabitants, if an 11applicant fails to file the application required by this 12Section in a timely manner and this failure to file is due to a 13mental or physical condition sufficiently severe so as to 14render the applicant incapable of filing the application in a 15timely manner, the Chief County Assessment Officer may extend 16the filing deadline for a period of 30 days after the applicant 17regains the capability to file the application, but in no case 18may the filing deadline be extended beyond 3 months of the 19original filing deadline. In order to receive the extension 20provided in this paragraph, the applicant shall provide the 21Chief County Assessment Officer with a signed statement from 22the applicant's physician, advanced practice registered nurse, 23or physician assistant stating the nature and extent of the 24condition, that, in the physician's, advanced practice 25registered nurse's, or physician assistant's opinion, the 26condition was so severe that it rendered the applicant   HB1701- 12 -LRB104 05876 HLH 15907 b1incapable of filing the application in a timely manner, and 2the date on which the applicant regained the capability to 3file the application.4    Beginning January 1, 1998, notwithstanding any other 5provision to the contrary, in counties having fewer than 63,000,000 inhabitants, if an applicant fails to file the 7application required by this Section in a timely manner and 8this failure to file is due to a mental or physical condition 9sufficiently severe so as to render the applicant incapable of 10filing the application in a timely manner, the Chief County 11Assessment Officer may extend the filing deadline for a period 12of 3 months. In order to receive the extension provided in this 13paragraph, the applicant shall provide the Chief County 14Assessment Officer with a signed statement from the 15applicant's physician, advanced practice registered nurse, or 16physician assistant stating the nature and extent of the 17condition, and that, in the physician's, advanced practice 18registered nurse's, or physician assistant's opinion, the 19condition was so severe that it rendered the applicant 20incapable of filing the application in a timely manner.21    In counties having less than 3,000,000 inhabitants, if an 22applicant was denied an exemption in taxable year 1994 and the 23denial occurred due to an error on the part of an assessment 24official, or his or her agent or employee, then beginning in 25taxable year 1997 the applicant's base year, for purposes of 26determining the amount of the exemption, shall be 1993 rather   HB1701- 13 -LRB104 05876 HLH 15907 b1than 1994. In addition, in taxable year 1997, the applicant's 2exemption shall also include an amount equal to (i) the amount 3of any exemption denied to the applicant in taxable year 1995 4as a result of using 1994, rather than 1993, as the base year, 5(ii) the amount of any exemption denied to the applicant in 6taxable year 1996 as a result of using 1994, rather than 1993, 7as the base year, and (iii) the amount of the exemption 8erroneously denied for taxable year 1994.9    For purposes of this Section, a person who will be 65 years 10of age during the current taxable year shall be eligible to 11apply for the homestead exemption during that taxable year. 12Application shall be made during the application period in 13effect for the county of his or her residence. 14    The Chief County Assessment Officer may determine the 15eligibility of a life care facility that qualifies as a 16cooperative to receive the benefits provided by this Section 17by use of an affidavit, application, visual inspection, 18questionnaire, or other reasonable method in order to insure 19that the tax savings resulting from the exemption are credited 20by the management firm to the apportioned tax liability of 21each qualifying resident. The Chief County Assessment Officer 22may request reasonable proof that the management firm has so 23credited that exemption.24    Except as provided in this Section, all information 25received by the chief county assessment officer or the 26Department from applications filed under this Section, or from   HB1701- 14 -LRB104 05876 HLH 15907 b1any investigation conducted under the provisions of this 2Section, shall be confidential, except for official purposes 3or pursuant to official procedures for collection of any State 4or local tax or enforcement of any civil or criminal penalty or 5sanction imposed by this Act or by any statute or ordinance 6imposing a State or local tax. Any person who divulges any such 7information in any manner, except in accordance with a proper 8judicial order, is guilty of a Class A misdemeanor.9    Nothing contained in this Section shall prevent the 10Director or chief county assessment officer from publishing or 11making available reasonable statistics concerning the 12operation of the exemption contained in this Section in which 13the contents of claims are grouped into aggregates in such a 14way that information contained in any individual claim shall 15not be disclosed.16    Notwithstanding any other provision of law, for taxable 17year 2017 and thereafter, in counties of 3,000,000 or more 18inhabitants, the amount of the exemption shall be the greater 19of (i) the amount of the exemption otherwise calculated under 20this Section or (ii) $2,000. 21    (c-5) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, each 22chief county assessment officer may approve this exemption for 23the 2020 taxable year, without application, for any property 24that was approved for this exemption for the 2019 taxable 25year, provided that: 26        (1) the county board has declared a local disaster as   HB1701- 15 -LRB104 05876 HLH 15907 b1    provided in the Illinois Emergency Management Agency Act 2    related to the COVID-19 public health emergency; 3        (2) the owner of record of the property as of January 4    1, 2020 is the same as the owner of record of the property 5    as of January 1, 2019; 6        (3) the exemption for the 2019 taxable year has not 7    been determined to be an erroneous exemption as defined by 8    this Code; and 9        (4) the applicant for the 2019 taxable year has not 10    asked for the exemption to be removed for the 2019 or 2020 11    taxable years. 12    Nothing in this subsection shall preclude or impair the 13authority of a chief county assessment officer to conduct 14audits of any taxpayer claiming an exemption under this 15Section to verify that the taxpayer is eligible to receive the 16exemption as provided elsewhere in this Section. 17    (c-10) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, each 18chief county assessment officer may approve this exemption for 19the 2021 taxable year, without application, for any property 20that was approved for this exemption for the 2020 taxable 21year, if:22        (1) the county board has declared a local disaster as 23    provided in the Illinois Emergency Management Agency Act 24    related to the COVID-19 public health emergency;25        (2) the owner of record of the property as of January 26    1, 2021 is the same as the owner of record of the property   HB1701- 16 -LRB104 05876 HLH 15907 b1    as of January 1, 2020;2        (3) the exemption for the 2020 taxable year has not 3    been determined to be an erroneous exemption as defined by 4    this Code; and5        (4) the taxpayer for the 2020 taxable year has not 6    asked for the exemption to be removed for the 2020 or 2021 7    taxable years.8    Nothing in this subsection shall preclude or impair the 9authority of a chief county assessment officer to conduct 10audits of any taxpayer claiming an exemption under this 11Section to verify that the taxpayer is eligible to receive the 12exemption as provided elsewhere in this Section. 13    (d) Each Chief County Assessment Officer shall annually 14publish a notice of availability of the exemption provided 15under this Section. The notice shall be published at least 60 16days but no more than 75 days prior to the date on which the 17application must be submitted to the Chief County Assessment 18Officer of the county in which the property is located. The 19notice shall appear in a newspaper of general circulation in 20the county.21    Notwithstanding Sections 6 and 8 of the State Mandates 22Act, no reimbursement by the State is required for the 23implementation of any mandate created by this Section. 24(Source: P.A. 101-635, eff. 6-5-20; 102-136, eff. 7-23-21; 25102-895, eff. 5-23-22.) 26    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon   HB1701- 17 -LRB104 05876 HLH 15907 b1becoming law.